Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2442.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [115.033] OUTDOOR USE OF RAINWATER AND STORMWATER. new text end new text begin (a) A state agency, political subdivision of the state, joint powers organization, or special purpose unit of government with authority to establish water-quality standards may allow using untreated rainwater or stormwater for outdoor purposes when the probability of consumption or immersion by humans or animals is low or nonexistent. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this section, "using untreated rainwater or stormwater for outdoor purposes" does not include using the water: new text end new text begin (1) as a source of drinking water; or new text end new text begin (2) for swimming or immersion. new text end new text begin (c) This section does not apply to or affect the use of rainwater and stormwater in agricultural activities that produce food crops for humans or livestock. new text end